Massachusetts, session 194th, S2117.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
All animals feel pain and stress. It is inhumane for humans to deliberately inflict this on 
them. Any animals that are currently being used for research purposes will have to be rehomed 
either by adoption or sanctuaries that can care for them. They will not be euthanized. If homes 
can not be found for them, they will be cared for by the institutions that have them until their 
natural death (no research on them). The state may use the canceled funds to provide for their 
care. They will be allowed adequate space and freedom and if they are social animals they will 
be given the opportunity for social contact with their own kind. Rats and mice are not exempt. 
Birds, reptiles and amphibians are also included.